Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6354.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 25. (1) The authority may issue its negotiable bonds and notes in a principal amount , which that in the opinion of the authority shall be is necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving its the authority's corporate purposes, including the all of the following: (a) The making of loans for housing projects and the making or purchasing of loans for the rehabilitation of residential real property. , the (b) The provision of money for the land acquisition and development fund as provided in this act. , the (c) The payment of interest on bonds and notes of the authority during construction. , the (d) The establishment of reserves to secure bonds and notes. , the (e) The provision of money for the housing development fund in order to make noninterest bearing advances to nonprofit housing corporations and consumer housing cooperatives as provided in this act. , the (f) The provision of money to be used for the land acquisition and development powers and purposes of the authority. , the (g) The development, rehabilitation, or acquisition of real and personal property for use as office facilities by the authority. , and all (h) All other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its the authority's corporate purposes and powers. (2) The authority may issue renewal notes, issue bonds to pay notes, and when it if the authority determines refunding expedient, refund bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other purpose. The refunding bonds shall must be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the bonds to be refunded. The authority may issue instruments separate from the obligations described in this section that establish a contractual right in the holder of the instrument to require mandatory tender for purchase of the obligations to which the instrument applies for such period of time and subject to such provisions as determined by the authority. may determine. (3) Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its the authority's notes or bonds shall be is a general obligations obligation of the authority payable out of revenues or money of the authority, subject only to agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging any particular receipts or revenues. (4) Whether or not the notes or bonds are of a form or character as to be negotiable instruments under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, the notes or bonds shall be and are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, subject only to the provisions of the notes or bonds for registration. (5) A bond issued by the authority is not subject to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. (6) The issuance of bonds and notes under this act is subject to the agency financing reporting act, 2002 PA 470, MCL 129.171 to 129.177. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.